Rhode Island, session 2025, SB987.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-60-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-60 entitled "Council on
Elementary and Secondary Education [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of
Education Act]" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-60-7. Department of elementary and secondary education — Personnel board.
(a) The board of regents shall maintain a department of elementary and secondary
education which shall perform the research, administrative, and instructional functions and duties,
including technical assistance and statewide educational information services for local school
districts, required of the regents by the provisions of this chapter. Within that department the
appointment, promotion, salaries, term of service, and dismissal of all professional employees,
including instructional and research employees, administrative employees, and secretaries shall be
at the pleasure of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education except that the regents
shall approve all assistant commissioners; all professional employees, including instructional and
research employees, and administrative employees may be initially engaged under contract for not
more than two (2) years. All professional employees, including instructional and research
employees, and administrative employees shall not be in the classified service of the state nor be
subject in any manner of control by the personnel administrator or by any officer or board other
than the commissioner of elementary and secondary education; provided, that all permanent
appointments of the commissioner to vacant, reestablish or newly established positions shall be

subject to approval by the Emergency Hiring Council established by Executive Order 95-2. All
appointments to positions at state operated schools shall be exempt from the preceding requirement
provided that total full time equivalent positions are within the authorized cap and all these
personnel are assigned exclusively to the schools. The hiring of individuals on a contract basis shall
be subject to state purchasing requirements. All non-classified employees of the board of regents
who shall have twenty (20) years, not necessarily consecutive, of service credit, these credits having
been earned in either the classified, non-classified, or unclassified service or any combination of
these, shall be deemed to have acquired full status in their positions as the status is defined by §
36-4-59; provided, that this provision shall not apply to those employees whose base entry date is
after August 7, 1996; and provided that this provision shall not apply to faculty employed by the
board of regents nor shall it apply to non-classified employees who have acquired tenure as faculty.
Employees who had permanent status prior to May 7, 1981, shall continue to retain their status.
Persons employed by the department on February 1, 1974 in either the classified or unclassified
service and who were receiving longevity payments on or before February 1, 1974 shall continue
to be eligible for longevity benefits upon transfer to the non-classified service within the
department.
(b) The table of organization, as submitted by the commissioner of elementary and
secondary education, together with the pay ranges, shall be subject to approval by the board of
regents.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit or interfere with the rights of
professional, administrative and secretarial employees of the department of education to
collectively bargain pursuant to chapters 11 of title 36 and chapter 7 of title 28 over all terms and
conditions of employment including, but not limited to, salaries, terms of service, and dismissal, or
to allow the commissioner or the department to abrogate any agreement reached by collective
bargaining.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002706
========
LC002706 - Page 2 of 3